Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 5. State Aid to Municipal and Private Air Navigation Facilities; Restricted Landing Areas

§ 771.
State aid for repair, maintenance, and improvement.

The Secretary is authorized to render financial assistance in the repair, maintenance, and improvement of municipal and privately owned air navigation facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 772.
Lease of land for restricted landing areas.

For the purpose of further development of an adequate system of air navigation facilities, the Secretary is authorized to lease in the name of the State areas of land suitable to the development of restricted landing areas, together with adequate area for appurtenant buildings and access roads.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 773.
Rules.

The Secretary is authorized to adopt rules governing the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 70.

§ 774.
Funds.

Funds appropriated for purposes enumerated in section 691 of this title may, at the discretion of the Secretary, be used for the purpose of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 222

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.